Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.555

Finding—Grants to improve readiness to learn.

(1) The legislature finds that helping children to arrive at school ready to learn is an important part of improving student learning.

(2) To the extent funds are appropriated, the superintendent of public instruction shall award grants to community-based consortiums that submit comprehensive plans that include strategies to improve readiness to learn.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 32 s 11; 1993 c 336 s 901. Formerly RCW 70.190.040.]

NOTES:

Transition plan—Report to the legislature—2011 1st sp.s. c 32: See note following RCW 70.305.005.

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.